New York, session 2025-2026, A32.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil rights law is amended by adding a new section 2 79-r to read as follows: 3 § 79-r. Collection of gender or sex designation information by munici- 4 palities. 1. All New York state municipalities that collect demographic 5 information about a person's gender or sex shall make available to the 6 person at the point of data collection an option to mark their gender or 7 sex as "x". 8 2. All municipalities shall update any applicable physical and online 9 forms or data systems in the regular course of business including, but 10 not limited to: 11 (a) updating printed forms to include the gender "x" option when such 12 forms are being reordered; 13 (b) updating websites, webpages, public facing online internet 14 services to include the gender "x" option when such websites, webpages 15 and public facing online internet services are being updated; and 16 (c) updating any links or other forms of sharing when websites, 17 webpages or other public facing online internet services are being 18 updated to reflect forms that have the gender "x" option. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00024-01-5